src/fst/morphology/stems/bardic.lexc
!****************************************************************************
!! # Bardic - Classical Irish
!
#! E. Uí Dhonnchadha
!
!# Nov 2020 
!****************************************************************************
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!LEXICON Root
!        Bardic;

LEXICON Bardiclex  !!≈ **@CODE@**

file+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+NG:filidh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+Len+NG:fhilidh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+Ecl+NG:bhfilidh	#;

file+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+NG:fileadh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Len+NG:fhileadh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Ecl+NG:bhfileadh	#;

file+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+NG:filidh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Len+NG:fhilidh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Ecl+NG:bhfilidh	#;

file+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+NG:filidh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+Len+NG:fhilidh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+Ecl+NG:bhfilidh	#;

file+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+NG:fileadha	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+Len+NG:fhileadha	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+Ecl+NG:bhfileadha	#;

file+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+NG:fileadh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+Len+NG:fhileadh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+Ecl+NG:bhfileadh	#;

file+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+NG:fileadhaibh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+Len+NG:fhileadhaibh	#;
file+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+Ecl+NG:bhfileadhaibh	#;



bíobha+Noun+Masc+Nom+Sg+NG:biodhbha	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Nom+Sg+Len+NG:bhiodhbha	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Nom+Sg+Ecl+NG:mbiodhbha	#;

bíobha+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+NG:biodhbhaidh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+Len+NG:bhiodhbhaidh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+Ecl+NG:mbiodhbhaidh	#;

bíobha+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+NG:biodhbhadh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Len+NG:bhiodhbhadh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Ecl+NG:mbiodhbhadh	#;

bíobha+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+NG:biodhbhaidh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Len+NG:bhiodhbhaidh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Ecl+NG:mbiodhbhaidh	#;

bíobha+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+NG:biodhbhaidh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+Len+NG:bhiodhbhaidh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+Ecl+NG:mbiodhbhaidh	#;

bíobha+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+NG:biodhbhadha	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+Len+NG:biodhbhadha	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+Ecl+NG:biodhbhadha	#;

bíobha+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+NG:biodhbhadh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+Len+NG:bhiodhbhadh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+Ecl+NG:mbiodhbhadh	#;

bíobha+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+NG:biodhbhadhaibh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+Len+NG:bhiodhbhadhaibh	#;
bíobha+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+Ecl+NG:mbiodhbhadhaibh	#;




cú+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+NG:coin	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+Len+NG:choin	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+Ecl+NG:gcoin	#;

cú+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+NG:con	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Len+NG:chon	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Ecl+NG:gcon	#;

cú+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+NG:coin	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Len+NG:choin	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Ecl+NG:gcoin	#;

cú+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+NG:coin	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+Len+NG:choin	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+Ecl+NG:gcoin	#;

cú+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+NG:cona	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+Len+NG:chona	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+Ecl+NG:gcona	#;

cú+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+NG:con	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+Len+NG:chon	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+Ecl+NG:gcon	#;

cú+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+NG:conaibh	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+Len+NG:chonaibh	#;
cú+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+Ecl+NG:gconaibh	#;



cara+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+NG:caraid	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+Len+NG:charaid	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Acc+Sg+Ecl+NG:gcaraid	#;

!!cara+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+NG:carad	#;	!! included in n-lex-irreg.txt
!!cara+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Len+NG:charad	#;
!!cara+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Ecl+NG:gcarad	#;

cara+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+NG:caraid	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Len+NG:charaid	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Dat+Sg+Ecl+NG:gcaraid	#;

cara+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+NG:caraid	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+Len+NG:charaid	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Nom+Pl+Ecl+NG:gcaraid	#;

cara+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+NG:cairde	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+Len+NG:chairde	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Acc+Pl+Ecl+NG:gcairde	#;

cara+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+NG:carad	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+Len+NG:charad	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Gen+Pl+Ecl+NG:gcarad	#;

cara+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+NG:cairdibh	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+Len+NG:chairadibh	#;
cara+Noun+Masc+Dat+Pl+Ecl+NG:gcairadibh	#;
